Massachusetts, session 194th, H3149.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to study and recommend reforms to the Low-Income Housing Tax Credit
(LIHTC) program to enhance its transparency, efficiency, and impact on affordable housing in
the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. The commission shall investigate and document: (a) The administration and
allocation of LIHTC resources at the state level; (b) Strategies to streamline project
requirements, reduce unnecessary costs, and incentivize long-term affordability; (c) The
feasibility of implementing supplementary state-level tax credits, expedited permitting, and
incentives for mixed-use and environmentally sustainable development; (d) Best practices to
prioritize the preservation of existing affordable housing and align resources with local housing
of 2

needs; and (e) Enhanced oversight mechanisms to ensure the transparent and equitable allocation
of credits.
SECTION 3. The commission shall consist of the Secretary of Housing and Livable
Communities, or a designee, who shall serve as chair; 1 member of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Speaker of the House; 1 member of the Senate appointed by the Senate
President; 1 member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the
House; 1 member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate; 2 members
appointed by the Governor, 1 with expertise in affordable housing development and 1 with
expertise in tax policy; 1 representative of a nonprofit housing advocacy organization, appointed
by the Governor; and 1 representative of a regional planning agency, appointed by the Governor.
SECTION 4. The commission shall hold no fewer than 3 public hearings to gather input
from stakeholders, including developers, housing advocates, municipal officials, and community
members.
SECTION 5. The commission shall file its report, including findings and
recommendations, with the clerks of the House of Representatives and Senate, the Joint
Committee on Housing, and the Joint Committee on Revenue not later than 12 months after the
effective date of this act.
of 2